Massachusetts, session 194th, H1263.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after section 4, the following section:-
Section 4A.
a) The following terms as used in this section shall have the following meanings:
“Classification,” the process of grouping risks with similar risk characteristics so that
differences in costs may be recognized.
“Classification plan,” any plan, definition or rule for the classification of risks including,
without limitation, classification by territory, driver or vehicle characteristics or use, and
experience rating or merit rating plans.
of 4

“Commissioner,” the Commissioner of Insurance, appointed pursuant to Section 6 of
Chapter 26 of the General Laws, or his or her designee.
“Expenses,” that portion of a rate attributable to acquisition, field supervision, collection
expenses, general expenses, taxes, licenses, commissions, residual market loads and fees.
“Filer,” the Insurer, Insurance Company Group or Rating Organization that files the rate
at issue.
“Insurance Company Group,” two or more Insurers under the same ownership or control,
as defined in Section 206 of Chapter 175 of the General Laws.
“Insurer,” any corporation, association, partnership, group or individual authorized to
write private passenger motor vehicle insurance in Massachusetts.
“Merit rating,” a rating procedure utilizing past motor vehicle accident and traffic
violation experience of the operators insured under the policy to forecast future losses by
measuring their loss experience against the loss experience of operators in the same classification
to produce a prospective premium credit, debit or unity modification.
“Premium,” the final cost of a policy, or coverage within a policy, to an individual
policyholder based on the particular drivers and motor vehicles insured under the policy.
“Rate,” the cost of insurance per exposure unit, whether expressed as a single number or
as a prospective loss cost with a factor to incorporate an individual Insurer's expenses, profit, and
variation in loss experience, prior to any application of individual risk variations based on loss or
expense considerations, and does not include minimum premium.
of 4

“Rate filing,” a filing of rates, rating factors or relativities, classification plans, or rating
manuals, together with supporting information, prepared by an Insurer, Insurance Company
Group, or Rating organization and filed in accordance with Section 7 of this chapter.
“Rating factor,” a number that is greater than zero that is applied to a rate to reflect the
specific characteristics of the risk, including but not limited to, rating territory, driver or vehicle
characteristics, merit rating plan, coverage level, and deductible option.
“Rating organization,” a rating organization duly licensed under section 8 of Chapter
175A of the General Laws.
“Supporting information,” (a) the experience and judgment of the filer and the experience
or data of other Insurers or others relied upon by the filer; (b) the interpretation of any other data
relied upon by the filer; (c) descriptions of methods used in making the rates; and (d) any other
information relied on by the filer in support of its rate filing, as the Commissioner may require to
be filed.
b) For private passenger motor vehicle insurance rates, a filer may group risks by
territorial classification based on the commissioner’s designation of territories pursuant to
Section 4 of this chapter.
c) Each rating plan for private passenger motor vehicle insurance that includes territorial
classifications shall assign a weight of no more than seventy-five per cent to individual territorial
loss cost indication and no less than twenty-five per cent to the state-wide average loss cost
indication. A filer must actuarially justify individual territorial loss cost indication and statewide
average loss cost indication with supporting information included in the filer’s rate filing.
of 4

d) A private passenger motor vehicle insurance rate shall be held to be unfairly
discriminatory if it is based on a rating plan that does not conform with subsections c and e of
this section. The commissioner shall disapprove, after a hearing, or suspend any rate filing, or
portion thereof, that contains a rating plan that does not conform with subsections c and e of this
section.
e) The filer shall not make any changes or revisions to, or otherwise implement in any
manner, a classification plan and/or rating factor that in any way limits, mitigates or eliminates
the impact of subsection c of this section.
f) The filer shall include a complete and detailed explanation of how it is complying with
subsections c and e of this section.
g) Every insurer licensed to write private passenger automobile insurance shall make a
rate filing to comply with this section within 60 days of its passage.
h) The intent and purpose of this section is to reasonably limit the difference in rates and
premiums between territories, thereby diminishing the disparate impact on policyholders.
i) The commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate additional rules and
regulations to implement the provisions of this section that further its intent and purpose.
of 4